public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX c èser furesi èser
SFX c èser furesion/L èser
SFX c èser furesione èser
SFX c èser furesioni/M èser
SFX c èser furesionse èser
SFX c èser furesisen/L èser
SFX c èser furesisene èser
SFX c èser furesiseni/M èser
SFX c èser furesisense èser
SFX c èser furesisié/P èser
SFX c èser furesisiede/P èser
SFX c èser furesisiege/P èser
SFX c èser furesision/L èser
SFX c èser furesisione èser
SFX c èser furesisioni/M èser
SFX c èser furesisionse èser
SFX c èser furesison/L èser
SFX c èser furesisone èser
SFX c èser furesisoni/M èser
SFX c èser furesisonse èser
SFX c èser fureson/L èser
SFX c èser furesone èser
SFX c èser furesoni/M èser
SFX c èser furesonse èser
SFX c èser fuse/I [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusen/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusene [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fuseni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusiede/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusiege/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusi [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusion/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusione [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisen/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisene [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusiseni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisiede/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisiege/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusision/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisione [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusison/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisone [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisoni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusisonse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fuson/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusone [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusoni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fusonse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser jèra/JLPR èser
SFX c èser jèrami/K èser
SFX c èser jèrau/Q èser
SFX c èser jère/JL èser
SFX c èser jèrelo/B èser
SFX c èser jèreƚo/B èser
SFX c èser jèremi/K èser
SFX c èser jèri/NP èser
SFX c èser jèrimo/L èser
SFX c èser jèrimoi/M èser
SFX c èser jèritu/O èser
SFX c èser jèro/JL èser
SFX c èser jèromi/K èser
SFX c èser sé/FPR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sémoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser séu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sí/FP [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser símoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser síu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarà/JLNR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saràe/R [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarè/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarèmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saré/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarémoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarésimo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarésimoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saréu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarí/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saría/JLNR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríami/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríatu/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríe/JLR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríelo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríeƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríemi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarímoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saríu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarò/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saròmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saralo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saraƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarami/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saratu/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarave/RS [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saremo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saren/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sareni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saresi/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saresiu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sariéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarimo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarion/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisen/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sariseni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisiéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarision/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarison/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisoni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sarisonse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saron/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saroni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser saronse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser selo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seme/H [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser semo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sen/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serà/JLNR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seràe/R [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serè/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serèmi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seré/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serémoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serésimo/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serésimoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seréu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serí/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser sería/JLNR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríami/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríatu/O [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríe/JLR [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríelo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríeƚo/B [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríemi/K [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serímoi/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser seríu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser serò/JL [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
