public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
èrder/cE
òlder/cE
ónder/cE
đónxer/cE
ŧèrner/cE
ŧénđer/cE
ŧederò/cJL
ŧenxerò/cJL
ƚèxer/cE
ƚuxerò/cJL
ađónxer/cE
abòrer/cE
acéñer/cE
adonxerò/cJL
aflixerò/cJL
akòjer/cE
akòrxer/cE
akoɉerò/cJL
akorderò/cJL
ameterò/cJL
antefàser/cE
antepóner/cE
aparcèñer/cE
aparceñerò/cJL
aparteñerò/cJL
aponerò/cJL
arderò/cJL
arkòjer/cE
arvèñer/cE
aséder/cE
asòlver/cE
ascèñer/cE
asceñerò/cJL
asisterò/cJL
astèñer/cE
asteñerò/cJL
astrénder/cE
astrenđerò/cJL
astrenxerò/cJL
atéñer/cE
atenderò/cJL
atraerò/cJL
axónxer/cE
béver/cE
bójer/cE
baterò/cJL
beverò/cJL
bojerò/cJL
ceñerò/cJL
dúxer/cE
dariderò/cJL
deŧíder/cE
debaterò/cJL
decéñer/cE
dedúxer/cE
defénder/cE
dekórer/cE
dekreserò/cJL
demeterò/cJL
depénđer/cE
depóner/cE
depenxerò/cJL
deríder/cE
desfríđer/cE
desfriđerò/cJL
desfrixerò/cJL
deskàder/cE
deskúxer/cE
deskaderò/cJL
deskonponerò/cJL
deskonveñerò/cJL
deskorerò/cJL
deskovèrxer/cE
deskoverxerò/cJL
deskriverò/cJL
deskuèrxer/cE
deskuerxerò/cJL
despèrder/cE
despiàxer/cE
desprométer/cE
desprovéder/cE
desténder/cE
destòrder/cE
destenderò/cJL
destorđerò/cJL
destràer/cE
destraerò/cJL
detéñer/cE
detraerò/cJL
devíder/cE
deviderò/cJL
dexđonxerò/cJL
dexdixerò/cJL
dexméter/cE
dexvèñer/cE
dexveñerò/cJL
dexxonxerò/cJL
dispenderò/cJL
divíder/cE
dixdixerò/cJL
eƚèxer/cE
eƚexerò/cJL
elèder/cE
eleđerò/cJL
elexerò/cJL
emeterò/cJL
erđerò/cJL
erxerò/cJL
eskluderò/cJL
espelerò/cJL
esploderò/cJL
estínguer/cE
estràer/cE
estraerò/cJL
evínŧer/cE
evinŧerò/cJL
exíɉer/cE
exíster/cE
eximerò/cJL
fàŧer/cE
fénder/cE
fónder/cE
faŧerò/cJL
fenderò/cJL
flèter/cE
fonderò/cJL
frànxer/cE
fríder/cE
franđerò/cJL
frapóner/cE
friđerò/cJL
frixerò/cJL
goderò/cJL
inŧèrner/cE
inŧíder/cE
inŧiderò/cJL
inakòrđer/cE
inakòrxer/cE
inakorxerò/cJL
inbaterò/cJL
incénder/cE
indónxer/cE
indonxerò/cJL
infóter/cE
infrànder/cE
infranderò/cJL
injòter/cE
inkòrder/cE
inkórer/cE
inkluderò/cJL
inkoncéñer/cE
inkontéñer/cE
inkorđerò/cJL
inkorxerò/cJL
insèguer/cE
insenderò/cJL
inskriverò/cJL
intòrder/cE
intardixerò/cJL
intarveñerò/cJL
interŧéder/cE
intersederò/cJL
intorxerò/cJL
intraprenderò/cJL
intraveñerò/cJL
intrometerò/cJL
inxónxer/cE
kànđer/cE
kórer/cE
koñóser/cE
komòver/cE
konđónxer/cE
konbaterò/cJL
kondonxerò/cJL
konkórer/cE
konpèter/cE
konponderò/cJL
konprometerò/cJL
konstrénđer/cE
kontèñer/cE
konteñerò/cJL
kontradíxer/cE
kontraveñerò/cJL
konvínŧer/cE
konvinŧerò/cJL
koròder/cE
koronperò/cJL
kostrenderò/cJL
koverderò/cJL
krederò/cJL
kuerđerò/cJL
lèxer/cE
luxerò/cJL
mòlder/cE
mónxer/cE
malméter/cE
mancèner/cE
mantèñer/cE
miederò/cJL
molxerò/cJL
nàser/cE
océñer/cE
okorerò/cJL
onxerò/cJL
oteñerò/cJL
pénxer/cE
parintenderò/cJL
parsèguer/cE
parvèrter/cE
perderò/cJL
perméter/cE
persuaderò/cJL
piànder/cE
pianderò/cJL
ponxerò/cJL
preƚúder/cE
predixerò/cJL
preméter/cE
prevéder/cE
prexumerò/cJL
prométer/cE
propenderò/cJL
proseguerò/cJL
protràer/cE
rénder/cE
rađonxerò/cJL
ravòlxer/cE
reŧéver/cE
reƚúxer/cE
rebójer/cE
receñerò/cJL
reeƚèxer/cE
reeleđerò/cJL
reflèter/cE
rekórer/cE
rekonponerò/cJL
rekovèrđer/cE
rekoverxerò/cJL
rekreserò/cJL
releđerò/cJL
remòver/cE
renderò/cJL
renpianxerò/cJL
reprénder/cE
reproduxerò/cJL
residerò/cJL
resovèñer/cE
respónder/cE
responderò/cJL
restrenderò/cJL
retòrđer/cE
retorderò/cJL
retraxerò/cJL
revèñer/cE
revederò/cJL
rexòlver/cE
riéser/cE
rinveñerò/cJL
sèguer/cE
sénder/cE
sedúxer/cE
senderò/cJL
sfenderò/cJL
sfríxer/cE
sfriderò/cJL
skòrder/cE
skoderò/cJL
skonbaterò/cJL
skonvèñer/cE
skorerò/cJL
skovèrxer/cE
skriverò/cJL
skuerxerò/cJL
soboɉerò/cJL
sokórer/cE
soradónxer/cE
soraintenderò/cJL
soraveñerò/cJL
sorinténder/cE
sosceñerò/cJL
sosteñerò/cJL
sotoponerò/cJL
sovèñer/cE
soxàser/cE
spàrxer/cE
spónxer/cE
spenxerò/cJL
stòrder/cE
strénđer/cE
straƚuxerò/cJL
strabojerò/cJL
strakorerò/cJL
straluxerò/cJL
stravolxerò/cJL
suàder/cE
suponerò/cJL
tèser/cE
tòrder/cE
temerò/cJL
torxerò/cJL
traƚúxer/cE
tradúxer/cE
traméter/cE
tranxijerò/cJL
tratèñer/cE
traxméter/cE
vèrter/cE
vénser/cE
vederò/cJL
verderò/cJL
viverò/cJL
xónxer/cE
xbàter/cE
xbarluxerò/cJL
xbojerò/cJL
xgrénxer/cE
xgrixerò/cJL
xlénder/cE
xlenxerò/cJL
xliederò/cJL
xmónxer/cE
xvòlxer/cE
